Maryland, session 2025, HB1116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 9–403 of Article – Family Law of the Annotated Code of Maryland be
repealed and reenacted, with amendments, and transferred to be Section(s) 3–609 of Article
– Public Safety of the Annotated Code of Maryland, to read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–609.
(a) There is a State Clearinghouse for Missing [Children] PERSONS operated by
the Department of State Police that is responsible for:
(1) the receipt, collection, and distribution of general information and
annual statistics regarding missing [children] PERSONS; and
(2) coordination of law enforcement agencies and other interested
[persons] INDIVIDUALS or groups within and outside the State regarding information on
[children] PERSONS who have disappeared from, or are thought to be located in, Maryland.
(b) For [children] PERSONS who have disappeared from or are thought to be
located in the State, the State Clearinghouse for Missing [Children] PERSONS:
(1) shall publish:
(i) the names of and relevant available information on missing
[children] PERSONS; and
(ii) annual statistics regarding missing [children] PERSONS; and
(2) may establish and maintain a list of organizations and groups that
provide volunteer search teams or resources relating to missing [children] PERSONS.
(c) The Secretary of State Police may develop, in cooperation with local law
enforcement agencies, a plan for voluntary fingerprinting programs for children.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Department of State Police shall study the Department’s capacity to report
to the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System information about persons who
have disappeared from, or thought to be located in, Maryland.

HOUSE BILL 1116 3
(b) On or before December 1, 2025, the Department of State Police shall report its
findings to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.